Wisconsin, session 2025, AB256.
do enact as follows:AB256,13Section 1. 118.02 (7d) of the statutes is created to read:AB256,1,54118.02 (7d) April 24, as part of Genocide Awareness Month, Armenian 5Genocide Awareness Day.AB256,21Section 2. Initial applicability.AB256,2,32(1) This act first applies to the school year beginning after the effective date of 3this subsection.AB256,2,44